Utah statutes.
31A-23a-406.5.   Conduct of escrow.

(1)  Only an escrow agent or a title insurer in compliance with Subsection 31A-4-107(1)(a) and Section 31A-14-211 shall conduct escrow.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not limit or expand the authority granted to:

(a)  a person defined as an escrow agent in Section 7-22-101;

(b)  a person licensed to practice law in Utah, if that person meets the requirements of Section 31A-23a-204;

(c)  a person licensed under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act; or

(d)  a person licensed under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing Act.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

